Illinois, session 104th, HB1749.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interscholastic Athletic Organization Act 5is amended by adding Section 1.30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 25/1.30 new)7    Sec. 1.30. Student transfers. An association or other 8entity that has as one of its purposes promoting, sponsoring, 9regulating, or in any manner providing for interscholastic 10athletics or any form of athletic competition among schools 11and students within this State shall adopt a policy that 12allows for a student to participate in interscholastic 13athletics immediately upon completing a transfer from one 14school to another school and enrolling in the other school. 15However, the policy may prohibit the student from 16participating in interscholastic athletics at that other 17school before the school transfer process is complete and the 18transfer has been accepted by the principal of the school from 19which the student is transferring and the principal of the 20school to which the student is transferring. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 222025.